Hawaii statutes.
[§658D-5] Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Arbitration" shall also encompass,
as appropriate, mediation, conciliation, and other forms of dispute resolution
as an alternative to international litigation.

"Center" means any center organized
as an independent nonprofit educational corporation duly established under the
laws of this State, whose principal purpose is to facilitate the resolution of
international business, trade, commercial, and other disputes between persons
by means of arbitration, mediation, conciliation, and other means as an
alternative to the resort to litigation.

"Nonresident of the United States"
means any person not a "resident of the United States".

"Person" means not only individuals,
but corporations, firms, associations, societies, communities, assemblies,
inhabitants of a district, or neighborhood, or persons known or unknown, and
the public generally and shall include a government or any agency,
instrumentality, or subdivision thereof where it appears, from the subject matter,
the sense and connection in which such words are used, that such construction
is intended.

"Resident of the United States"
means:

(1) A natural person who maintains sole residence
within a state, possession, commonwealth, or territory of the United States or
within the District of Columbia; or

(2) Any other person organized or incorporated under
the laws of the United States, any state, possession, commonwealth, or
territory thereof, or the District of Columbia.

"Written undertaking to arbitrate"
shall mean a writing in which a person undertakes to submit a dispute to
arbitration, without regard to whether that undertaking is sufficient to
sustain a valid and enforceable contract or is subject to defenses. A written
undertaking may be part of a contract, may be a separate writing, and may be
contained in correspondence, telegrams, telexes, or any other form of written
communication. [L 1988, c 186, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next